Wyoming, session 2026, HB0059.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 22-21-103 is amended to read:

22-21-103. How bond question to be submitted to
electors; contents; civil cause of action; approval.

Each bond question shall be submitted to a vote of the
qualified electors of the political subdivision. Every bond
election shall be held on the same day as a primary
election or a general election, or on the Tuesday next
HB0059

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0275
following the first Monday in May or November, or on the
Tuesday next following the third Monday in August. Not less
than one hundred ten (110) days before a bond election, the
political subdivision shall provide written notification to
the county clerk specifying the date of the election and
the bond question. The bond question shall state the
purpose of the bonds in a true and impartial manner, the
maximum principal amount thereof, the maximum number of
years allowed for the indebtedness and the maximum rate of
interest to be paid thereon. The secretary of state may
promulgate reasonable rules for conducting bond elections
where the election is not held at the same time as the
general or primary election. A qualified elector of the
political subdivision where the election is held may bring
a civil cause of action against the political subdivision
alleging the bond question failed to state the purpose of
the bond in a true and impartial manner in violation of
this section. A bond challenged under this section shall
not be issued until after a court has entered a final
judgment or decree in the action and all appeals from that
judgment have been exhausted or after the time for filing
appeals has expired.

HB0059

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0275
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0059